Utah statutes.
53B-2a-105.   Utah College of Applied Technology -- Composition.

The Utah College of Applied Technology is composed of the following college campuses:

(1)  the Bridgerland Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Box Elder School District;

(b)  the Cache School District;

(c)  the Logan School District; and

(d)  the Rich School District;

(2)  the Ogden-Weber Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Ogden City School District; and

(b)  the Weber School District;

(3)  the Davis Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Davis School District; and

(b)  the Morgan School District;

(4)  the Tooele Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing the Tooele County School District;

(5)  the Mountainland Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Alpine School District;

(b)  the Nebo School District;

(c)  the Provo School District;

(d)  the South Summit School District;

(e)  the North Summit School District;

(f)  the Wasatch School District; and

(g)  the Park City School District;

(6)  the Uintah Basin Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Daggett School District;

(b)  the Duchesne School District; and

(c)  the Uintah School District;

(7)  the Southwest Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing:

(a)  the Beaver School District;

(b)  the Garfield School District;

(c)  the Iron School District; and

(d)  the Kane School District; and

(8)  the Dixie Applied Technology College Campus which serves the geographic area encompassing the Washington School District.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2009 General Session

